sk-SK: Odroda kapusty: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Kvitnúca (okrasná); Zelená; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Pekinská (čínska/wombok); Červená; Guľatá; Savoyská; Sugarloaf; Superstar hybrid; Biela; Iné
hr-HR: Sorta kupusa: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Cvjetni (ukrasni); Zeleni; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Kineski kupus (napa / wombok); Crveni; Okrugli; Kelj; Sugarloaf; Superstar hibrid; Bijeli; Ostalo
zh-CN: 卷心菜品种: Bilko; 小白菜; 早熟泽西韦克菲尔德; 荷兰扁甘蓝; 开花（观赏型）; 绿色; Hispi（甜心）; 一月王; 荷兰晚熟扁甘蓝; 大白菜（中国/结球白菜）; 红色; 圆形; 皱叶甘蓝; 圆锥卷心菜; Superstar 杂交品种; 白色; 其他
it: Varietà di cavolo: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Da fiore (ornamentale); Verde; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Napa (cinese/wombok); Rosso; Tondo; Verza; Pan di zucchero; Ibrido Superstar; Bianco; Altro
es: Variedad de col: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; En flor (ornamental); Verde; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Napa (china/wombok); Rojo; Redondo; Saboya; Pan de azúcar; Híbrido Superstar; Blanco; Otro
ko: 양배추 품종: 빌코; 청경채; 얼리 저지 웨이크필드; 플랫 더치; 꽃양배추(관상용); 녹색; 히스피(스위트하트); 재뉴어리 킹; 레이트 플랫 더치; 배추(차이니즈/웜복); 빨간색; 원형; 사보이; 슈가로프; 슈퍼스타 하이브리드; 흰색; 기타
pt-BR: Variedade de repolho: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Flor (ornamental); Verde; Hispi (Coração); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Acelga (Chinesa/Wombok); Roxa; Redonda; Crespa; Pão de açúcar; Híbrido Superstar; Branca; Outra
ja: キャベツの種類: ビルコ; チンゲンサイ; アーリージャージーウェイクフィールド; フラットダッチ; 花キャベツ (観賞用); 緑; ヒスピ (スウィートハート); ジャニュアリーキング; レイトフラットダッチ; 白菜; 赤; 丸玉; サボイ; シュガーローフ; スーパースターハイブリッド; 白; その他
pt-PT: Variedade de repolho: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Floração (ornamental); Verde; Hispi (Coração de boi); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Napa (chinesa/wombok); Vermelho; Redonda; Lombardo; Pão de açúcar; Híbrido superstar; Branco; Outro
fi: Kaalilajike: Bilko; Paksoi; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Kukkiva (koriste); Vihreä; Suippokaali; January King; Late Flat Dutch; Kiinankaali (napa / wombok); Punainen; Pyöreä; Savoyn; Sokeritoppa; Superstar-hybridi; Valkoinen; Muu
fr: Variété de chou: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Plat de Hollande; À fleurs (ornemental); Vert; Hispi (Sweetheart); Roi de janvier; Plat de Hollande tardif; Napa (chinois/wombok); Rouge; Rond; De Milan; Pain de sucre; Hybride superstar; Blanc; Autre
ro-RO: Varietate de varză: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Decorativă (cu flori); Verde; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Napa (chinezească / wombok); Roșie; Rotundă; Creață (Savoy); Căpățână de zahăr (Sugarloaf); Hibrid Superstar; Albă; Altele
de: Kohlsorte: Bilko; Pak Choi; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Zierkohl; Grün; Spitzkohl (Hispi/Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Napa (Chinakohl); Rot; Rund; Wirsing; Zuckerhut; Superstar Hybrid; Weiß; Sonstige
th: พันธุ์กะหล่ำปลี: บิลโก; บ็อกชอย; เออร์ลีย์ เจอร์ซีย์ เวกฟิลด์; แฟลตดัตช์; กะหล่ำประดับ (ไม้ประดับ); สีเขียว; ฮิสปิ (สวีตฮาร์ต); แจนยัวรี คิง; เลท แฟลตดัตช์; ผักกาดขาว (Chinese / Wombok); สีแดง; ทรงกลม; ซาวอย; ชูการ์โลฟ; ซูเปอร์สตาร์ ไฮบริด; สีขาว; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Kopūstų rūšis: Bilko; Kininiai bastučiai (Bok choy); Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Žydintys (dekoratyviniai); Žalieji; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Pekino (kininiai / wombok); Raudonieji; Apvalieji; Savojos; Sugarloaf; Superstar hibridas; Baltieji; Kita
tr: Lahana çeşidi: Bilko; Çin lahanası (Bok choy); Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Çiçekli (süs); Yeşil; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Napa (Çin/wombok); Kırmızı; Yuvarlak; Savoy; Sugarloaf; Superstar hibrit; Beyaz; Diğer
ru: Сорт капусты: Билко; Бок-чой; Ранняя Джерси Уэйкфилд; Плоская голландская; Цветущая (декоративная); Зеленая; Хиспи (Свитхарт); Январский король; Поздняя плоская голландская; Пекинская (китайская); Краснокочанная; Круглая; Савойская; Сахарная голова; Гибрид Суперстар; Белокочанная; Другое
en: Cabbage variety: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Flowering (ornamental); Green; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Napa (Chinese / wombok); Red; Round; Savoy; Sugarloaf; Superstar hybrid; White; Other
nl: Kool soort: Bilko; Paksoi; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Bloeiend (sier); Groen; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Napa (Chinese kool / wombok); Rood; Rond; Savooiekool; Groenlof; Superstar-hybride; Wit; Overig
hu: Káposztafajta: Bilko; Bordáskel (Bok choy); Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Virágzó (díszkáposzta); Zöld; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Kínai kel (Napa/wombok); Vörös; Kerek; Kelkáposzta (Savoy); Cukorsüveg; Superstar hibrid; Fehér; Egyéb
sv: Kålssort: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Blommande (prydnadskål); Grön; Spetskål (Hispi/Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Salladskål (Napa/Kinesisk/Wombok); Röd; Rund; Savoykål; Sockertopp; Superstar-hybrid; Vit; Övrigt
da: Kålvariant: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Prydkål (blomstrende); Grøn; Spidskål (Hispi); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Kinakål (Napa/wombok); Rød; Rund; Savoy; Sukkerhoved; Superstar-hybrid; Hvid; Andet
nb: Kålvariant: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Blomstrende (pryd); Grønn; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Napa (kinakål / wombok); Rød; Rund; Savoykål; Sugarloaf; Superstar-hybrid; Hvit; Annet
el: Ποικιλία λάχανου: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Ανθισμένο (καλλωπιστικό); Πράσινο; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Napa (Κινέζικο / Wombok); Κόκκινο; Στρογγυλό; Σαβοΐας; Sugarloaf; Superstar υβρίδιο; Λευκό; Άλλο
cs: Odrůda hlávkového zelí: Bilko; Pak choi; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Kvetoucí (okrasná); Zelené; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Pekingské (čínské / wombok); Červené; Kulaté; Hlávková kapusta; Sugarloaf; Superstar hybrid; Bílé; Jiné
zh-TW: 高麗菜品種: 比爾可白菜; 小白菜; 澤西極早生甘藍; 扁平荷蘭甘藍; 開花 (觀賞用); 綠色; 甜心高麗菜 (Hispi); 一月王高麗菜; 晚生扁平荷蘭甘藍; 大白菜; 紅色; 圓形; 皺葉高麗菜; 糖麵包高麗菜; 巨星雜交高麗菜; 白色; 其他
sl-SI: Sorta zelja: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Cvetoče (okrasno); Zeleno; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Napa (kitajsko / wombok); Rdeče; Okroglo; Savojsko; Sugarloaf; Hibrid Superstar; Belo; Drugo
bg-BG: Сорт зеле: Билко (Bilko); Бок чой; Ърли Джърси Уейкфийлд; Флат Дъч (Flat Dutch); Цъфтящо (декоративно); Зелено; Хиспи (Sweetheart); January King; Лейт Флат Дъч (Late Flat Dutch); Напа (китайско зеле); Червено; Кръгло; Савойско; Шугърлоуф (Sugarloaf); Суперстар (Superstar) хибрид; Бяло; Други
pl: Odmiana kapusty: Bilko; Bok choy; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Kwitnąca (ozdobna); Zielona; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Pekińska (Napa); Czerwona; Okrągła; Włoska; Głowa cukru; Hybryda Superstar; Biała; Inne
vi: Giống bắp cải: Bilko; Cải thìa; Early Jersey Wakefield; Flat Dutch; Có hoa (trang trí); Xanh lá; Hispi (Sweetheart); January King; Late Flat Dutch; Napa (Cải thảo Trung Quốc / wombok); Đỏ; Tròn; Savoy; Sugarloaf; Superstar lai; Trắng; Khác